Wisconsin, session 2025, SB737.
do enact as follows:SB737,11Section 1. Chapter 420 of the statutes is created to read:SB737,2,32CHAPTER 4203LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENTSSB737,2,44420.01 Definitions. In this chapter:SB737,2,65(1) “Advertisement” means a commercial message in any medium that solicits 6a consumer to enter into a lease-purchase agreement.SB737,3,47(2) “Cash-sale price” means the price stated in a lease-purchase agreement 1for which the lessor would have sold and the consumer would have bought the goods 2that are the subject of the lease-purchase agreement if the transaction had been a 3sale for cash. “Cash-sale price” may include taxes and charges for delivery, 4installation, servicing, repairs, alterations, or improvements.SB737,3,75(3) “Consumer” means an individual who rents goods, to be used primarily for 6personal, family, or household purposes, under a lease-purchase agreement and 7who resides in this state at the time of executing the lease-purchase agreement.SB737,3,98(4) “Goods” means personal property that a consumer acquires the right to 9use under a lease-purchase agreement.SB737,3,1110(5) “Lease-purchase agreement” means an agreement for the use of goods by 11an individual if all of the following apply:SB737,3,1212(a) The goods are to be used for personal, family, or household purposes.SB737,3,1313(b) The agreement is for an initial period of 4 months or less.SB737,3,1614(c) The agreement is automatically renewable with each payment after the 15initial period under par. (b), but the agreement does not obligate the consumer to 16continue renting or using the goods beyond the initial period.SB737,3,1717(d) The agreement permits the consumer to become the owner of the goods.SB737,3,2018(6) “Lease-purchase property” means personal property that is owned by the 19lessor at the time it is physically displayed and offered to a consumer as the subject 20of, but prior to the execution of, a lease-purchase agreement.SB737,3,2321(7) “Lessor” means a person who regularly provides the use of goods under a 22lease-purchase agreement and to whom periodic payments are initially payable 23under the lease-purchase agreement.SB737,4,21420.02 Exempted transactions; relationship to other law. (1) This 2chapter does not apply to any of the following:SB737,4,43(a) An agreement for the use of personal property primarily for business, 4commercial, or agricultural purposes.SB737,4,55(b) A lease of a safe deposit box.SB737,4,86(c) A lease or bailment of personal property that is incidental to the lease of 7real property and that provides that the consumer has no option to purchase the 8leased personal property.SB737,4,99(d) A lease of a motor vehicle, as defined in s. 218.0101 (22).SB737,4,1010(e) A lease of a mobile home, as defined in s. 101.91 (10).SB737,4,1211(2) Lease-purchase agreements that comply with this chapter are not 12governed by any provision of chs. 401 to 427 and 429.SB737,4,1513420.03 General requirements for lease-purchase agreements. (1) A 14lease-purchase agreement shall be in writing, dated, signed by the consumer and 15lessor, and completed as to all essential provisions.SB737,4,1816(2) The printed or typed portion of the lease-purchase agreement, other than 17instructions for completion, shall be in at least 8-point type size. The lease-18purchase agreement shall be designated “lease-purchase agreement.” Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb737 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb737 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB737 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB737 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB737: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting